Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.230

Power to disband boundary review board.

When a county and the cities and towns within the county have adopted a comprehensive plan and consistent development regulations pursuant to the provisions of chapter 36.70A RCW, the county may, at the discretion of the county legislative authority, disband the boundary review board in that county.

[ 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 22.]

NOTES:

Section headings not law—1991 sp.s. c 32: See RCW 36.70A.902.